Alaska, session 34, HB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Article 5. Standard Time. 06 Sec. 44.12.400. Exemption from daylight saving time. The state exempts 07 itself from observation of advanced time, also known as daylight saving time, during 08 the period set under 15 U.S.C. 260a for the advancement of time each calendar year, 09 and the entire state shall observe the standard time that is otherwise applicable during 10 that period. 11 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect November 3, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.